Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 19. Health, Safety, and Welfare
§ 21-19-61.
Advertising of municipal activities by certain municipalities.

Any municipality in this state which has a population in excess of one hundred thousand people may set aside, appropriate and expend moneys for the purpose of advertising and bringing to the attention of the citizens of such municipality the reasons for and status of any municipal activity, litigation, franchise, proposed bond issue, and any other municipal matter about which it is for the best interest of the people that they be fully informed.

Such advertising and publicizing may be done by newspaper, magazine, radio, television, or by any combination of same, which in the judgment of the governing body of such municipality will be helpful toward advancing the moral, financial and other interests of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-125.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 540, §§ 1-3.

§ 21-19-63.
Requiring maps of subdivisions to be furnished and approved; effect of dedication; easement declared abandoned.

The governing authorities of municipalities may provide that any person desiring to subdivide a tract of land within the corporate limits shall submit a map and plat of such subdivision, and a correct abstract of title of the land platted, to said governing authorities, to be approved by them before the same shall be filed for record in the land records of the county. Where the municipality has adopted an ordinance so providing, no such map or plat of any such subdivision shall be recorded by the chancery clerk unless same has been approved by said governing authorities. In all cases where a map or plat of the subdivision is submitted to the governing authorities of a municipality, and is by them approved, all streets, roads, alleys and other public ways set forth and shown on said map or plat shall be thereby dedicated to the public use, and shall not be used otherwise unless and until said map or plat is vacated in the manner provided by law, notwithstanding that said streets, roads, alleys or other public ways have not been actually opened for the use of the public. If any easement dedicated pursuant to the provisions of this section for a street, road, alley or other public purpose is determined to be not needed for the public purpose, the easement may be declared abandoned, and ownership of the fee underlying the easement shall revert, regardless of the date of dedication, to the adjoining property owner or owners at the time of abandonment. Ownership of the easement shall extend to the centerline of said abandoned street, road or public way. Such abandonment and reversion shall not affect any private easements which might exist.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2937; 1906, § 3328; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5825; 1930, § 2405; 1942, § 3374-123; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 123; Laws, 2008, ch. 339, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 531, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 14, 2009.).

§ 21-19-65.
Matching funds for social and community service programs.

The governing authorities of any municipality shall have the power to expend monies from the municipal general fund to match any other funds for the purpose of supporting social and community service programs including, but not limited to, juvenile residential treatment centers; juvenile and half-way houses; prenatal care facilities; child day care facilities; mentally ill and alcoholics half-way houses; child and adult emergency shelters; elderly home health aides programs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7185-31; Laws, 1972, ch. 514, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 367, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1985).

§ 21-19-67.
Annual donations to chartered chapters of the Boys and Girls Clubs of America or the Young Men’s Christian Association (YMCA), or to certain certified farmers’ markets located within the municipality.

The governing authority of any municipality in the state, in its discretion, is authorized to donate annually, out of any funds in the municipal treasury, to:

Boys and Girls Club.— Any chartered chapter of the Boys and Girls Clubs of America located within the municipality, provided that the cumulative sum of donations to all chapters within the municipality does not exceed the amount generated in the municipality by one-fourth (1/4) mill on all of the taxable property within the municipality, during the fiscal year in which the donations are made. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes the imposition of additional tax.

Young Men’s Christian Association (YMCA).— Any chartered chapter of the YMCA located within the municipality, out of any funds in the treasury of the municipality, provided that the cumulative sum of donations to all chapters within the municipality does not exceed the amount generated in the municipality by one-fourth (1/4) mill on all of the taxable property within the municipality, during the fiscal year in which the donations are made. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes the imposition of additional tax.

Farmers’ markets.— Any farmers’ market that is certified by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce and operating within the municipality, not to exceed the amount that would be generated from the levy of a one-fourth (1/4) mill ad valorem tax upon all taxable property in the municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 396, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 21-19-69.
Donating to support certified farmers’ market.

The governing authorities of any municipality of this state, in their discretion, may donate annually out of any money in the municipal treasury, such sums as deemed advisable to support any farmers’ market that is certified by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce and operating within the municipality, not to exceed the amount that would be generated from the levy of a one-fourth (1/4) mill ad valorem tax upon all taxable property in the municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 467, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 396, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2013.